Oklahoma, session 2025, SB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.32A, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.32A. A. Except as otherwise provided in


subsection H of this section, for tax years beginning on or after


January 1, 2003 2003 through 2025, but with respect to tax credits


for eligible renewable resources described by subparagraphs b, c and


d of paragraph 2 of this subsection, for tax years ending not later


than December 31, 2021, there shall be allowed a credit against the


tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title to a taxpayer for the


taxpayer’s production and sale to an unrelated person of electricity


generated by zero-emission facilities located in this state. As


used in this section:

Req. No. 796 Page 1


1. “Electricity generated by zero-emission facilities” means


electricity that is exclusively produced by any facility located in


this state with a rated production capacity of one megawatt (1 mw)


or greater, constructed for the generation of electricity and placed


in operation after June 4, 2001, and with respect to electricity


generated by wind for any facility placed in operation not later


than July 1, 2017, which utilizes eligible renewable resources as


its fuel source. The construction and operation of such facilities


shall result in no pollution or emissions that are or may be harmful


to the environment, pursuant to a determination by the Department of


Environmental Quality; and


2. “Eligible renewable resources” means resources derived from:


a. wind,


b. moving water,


c. sun, or


d. geothermal energy.


B. For facilities placed in operation on or after January 1,


2003, and before January 1, 2007, the amount of the credit for the


electricity generated on or after January 1, 2003, but prior to


January 1, 2004, shall be seventy-five one-hundredths of one cent


($0.0075) for each kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by zero-


emission facilities. For electricity generated on or after January


1, 2004, but prior to January 1, 2007, the amount of the credit


shall be fifty one-hundredths of one cent ($0.0050) per kilowatt-

Req. No. 796 Page 2


hour for electricity generated by zero-emission facilities. For


electricity generated on or after January 1, 2007, but prior to


January 1, 2012, the amount of the credit shall be twenty-five one-


hundredths of one cent ($0.0025) per kilowatt-hour of electricity


generated by zero-emission facilities. For facilities placed in


operation on or after January 1, 2007, and before January 1, 2021,


or with respect to electricity generated by wind for any facility


placed in operation not later than July 1, 2017, the amount of the


credit for the electricity generated on or after January 1, 2007,


shall be fifty one-hundredths of one cent ($0.0050) for each


kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by zero-emission facilities.


C. Credits may be claimed with respect to electricity generated


on or after January 1, 2003, during a ten-year period following the


date that the facility is placed in operation on or after June 4,


2001, or through tax year 2025, whichever occurs earlier.


D. 1. For credits generated prior to January 1, 2014, if the


credit allowed pursuant to this section exceeds the amount of income


taxes due or if there are no state income taxes due on the income of


the taxpayer, the amount of the credit allowed but not used in any


tax year may be carried forward as a credit against subsequent


income tax liability for a period not exceeding ten (10) years.


2. Except as provided by paragraph 3 of this subsection, for


credits generated, but not used, on or after January 1, 2014, the


Oklahoma Tax Commission shall refund, at the taxpayer’s election,

Req. No. 796 Page 3


directly to the taxpayer eighty-five percent (85%) of the face


amount of such credits. The direct refund of the credits pursuant


to this paragraph shall be available to all taxpayers, including,


without limitation, pass-through entities and taxpayers subject to


Section 2355 of this title, but shall not be available to any


entities falling within the provisions of subsection E of this


section. The amount of any direct refund of credits actually


received at the eighty-five percent (85%) level by the taxpayer


pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to the tax imposed


by Section 2355 of this title. If the pass-through entity does not


file a claim for a direct refund, the pass-through entity shall


allocate the credit to one or more of the shareholders, partners or


members of the pass-through entity; provided, the total of all


credits refunded or allocated shall not exceed the amount of the


credit or refund to which the pass-through entity is entitled. For


the purposes of this paragraph, “pass-through entity” means a


corporation that for the applicable tax year is treated as an S


corporation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability


partnership, trust or limited liability company that for the


applicable tax year is not taxed as a corporation for federal income


tax purposes.


3. With respect to credits claimed for the first time on or


after July 1, 2019, or the effective date of this act, whichever

Req. No. 796 Page 4


date last occurs, a taxpayer may irrevocably elect to not receive a


direct refund for a given tax year. Any credits not directly


refunded may be carried forward as a credit against subsequent


income tax liability for a period not exceeding ten (10) years, but


in no event shall credit be carried forward to tax year 2026 or


subsequent tax years. If a taxpayer makes the irrevocable election


to carry over credits for a given tax year pursuant to this


paragraph, any credits remaining in the tenth year of carry forward


or tax year 2025, whichever occurs first, shall be refunded at


eighty-five percent (85%).


E. Any nontaxable entities, including agencies of the State of


Oklahoma or political subdivisions thereof, shall be eligible to


establish a transferable tax credit in the amount provided in


subsection B of this section. Such tax credit shall be a property


right available to a state agency or political subdivision of this


state to transfer or sell to a taxable entity, whether individual or


corporate, who shall have an actual or anticipated income tax


liability under Section 2355 of this title. These tax credit


provisions are authorized as an incentive to the State of Oklahoma,


its agencies and political subdivisions to encourage the expenditure


of funds in the development, construction and utilization of


electricity from zero-emission facilities as defined in subsection A


of this section.



Req. No. 796 Page 5


F. For credits generated prior to January 1, 2014, the amount


of the credit allowed, but not used, shall be freely transferable at


any time during the ten (10) years following the year of


qualification. Any person to whom or to which a tax credit is


transferred shall have only such rights to claim and use the credit


under the terms that would have applied to the entity by whom or by


which the tax credit was transferred. The provisions of this


subsection shall not limit the ability of a tax credit transferee to


reduce the tax liability of the transferee, regardless of the actual


tax liability of the tax credit transferor, for the relevant taxable


period. The transferor initially allowed the credit and any


subsequent transferees shall jointly file a copy of any written


transfer agreement with the Oklahoma Tax Commission within thirty


(30) days of the transfer. The written agreement shall contain the


name, address and taxpayer identification number or Social Security


number of the parties to the transfer, the amount of the credit


being transferred, the year the credit was originally allowed to the


transferor, and the tax year or years for which the credit may be


claimed. The Tax Commission may promulgate rules to permit


verification of the validity and timeliness of the tax credit


claimed upon a tax return pursuant to this subsection but shall not


promulgate any rules that unduly restrict or hinder the transfers of


such tax credit. The tax credit allowed by this section, upon the


election of the taxpayer, may be claimed as a payment of tax, a

Req. No. 796 Page 6


prepayment of tax or a payment of estimated tax for purposes of


Section 1803 or Section 2355 of this title.


G. For electricity generation produced and sold in a calendar


year, the tax credit allowed by the provisions of this section, upon


election of the taxpayer, shall be treated and may be claimed as a


payment of tax, a prepayment of tax or a payment of estimated tax


for purposes of Section 2355 of this title on or after July 1 of the


following calendar year.


H. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable until the provisions


of this subsection shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011.


Beginning July 1, 2011, the credit authorized by this section may be


claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure or other


act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, according to the provisions


of this section. Any tax credits which accrue during the period of


July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, may not be claimed for any


period prior to the taxable year beginning January 1, 2012. No


credits which accrue during the period of July 1, 2010, through June


30, 2011, may be used to file an amended tax return for any taxable


year prior to the taxable year beginning January 1, 2012.


I. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the


total amount of credits authorized by this section with respect to

Req. No. 796 Page 7


eligible renewable resources described by subparagraphs b, c and d


of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section used to offset tax or


paid as a refund shall be adjusted annually to limit the annual


amount of credits to Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00).


The Tax Commission shall annually calculate and publish a percentage


by which the credits authorized by subparagraphs b, c and d of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section shall be reduced so the


total amount of credits used to offset tax or paid as a refund does


not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) per year.


The formula to be used for the percentage adjustment shall be Five


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) divided by the credits


claimed in the second preceding year.


J. Pursuant to subsection I of this section, in the event the


total tax credits authorized by this section with respect to


eligible renewable resources described by subparagraphs b, c and d


of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section exceed Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in any calendar year, the Tax


Commission shall permit any excess over Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($500,000.00) but shall factor such excess into the


percentage adjustment formula for subsequent years.


K. Any credits authorized by this section with respect to


eligible renewable resources described by subparagraphs b, c and d


of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section not used or unable to



Req. No. 796 Page 8


be used because of the provisions of subsection I or J of this


section may be carried over until such credits are fully used.


L. The Tax Commission shall prepare an annual report and submit


it to the Office of the State Secretary of Energy and Environment,


the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives


and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate


summarizing the amount of credits allowed pursuant to subparagraphs


b, c and d of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section. The


Secretary of Energy and Environment shall submit recommendations for


changes to the tax credit to the Governor, the Speaker of the


Oklahoma House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of


the Oklahoma State Senate within sixty (60) days after receipt of


the report from the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-796 QD 12/30/2024 5:20:05 PM

















Req. No. 796 Page 9